Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1907 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Railroad


Safety Act”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Deadly or dangerous weapon” includes all weapons listed in


Section 1287 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any other


weapon capable of inflicting serious bodily injury, except for a

Req. No. 3220 Page 1


weapon carried for lawful self-defense as provided in the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act;


2. “Passenger” means any person served by the railroad company;


3. “Railroad company” means any individuals, businesses, or


governmental entities providing transport to passengers or cargo by


train;


4. “Station” means a train station, stop, platform, or depot or


any facility operated, leased by, or operated on behalf of a


railroad company. This term shall include the parking lots or


parking areas adjacent to a station and a reasonable area


immediately adjacent to the rails on which a train operated by a


railroad company is currently traveling or any designated stop along


the route traveled by a train operated by a railroad company; and


5. “Train” means a steam engine, diesel, electric, or other


motor, with or without cars coupled with such engine, operated upon


rails.


C. 1. No person shall by force or violence, or threat of force


or violence, seize or exercise control of any train. Any person


violating this subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


Class B1 felony offense punishable by a fine not more than Twenty


Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections for not more than twenty (20) years,


or by both such fine and imprisonment.



Req. No. 3220 Page 2


2. No person shall intimidate, threaten, assault, or batter any


engineer, conductor, attendant, guard, or passenger of any train


with intent to violate paragraph 1 of this subsection. Any person


violating this paragraph shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


Class B4 felony offense punishable by a fine not more than Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections for not more than ten (10) years, or


by both such fine and imprisonment.


3. Any person violating paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection


using a dangerous or deadly weapon shall, upon conviction, be guilty


of a Class B1 felony offense punishable by a fine not more than


Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than twenty


(20) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


4. It shall be unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm


into or within any train, station, or other transportation facility,


unless such action is determined to have been in defensive force


resulting from reasonable fear of imminent peril of death or great


bodily harm to oneself or another. Such person shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense punishable by a


fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not


more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.



Req. No. 3220 Page 3


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3220 MSBB 1/13/2026 1:02:41 PM





































Req. No. 3220 Page 4